Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.120

Action against public corporations.

An action may be maintained against a county or other of the public corporations mentioned or described in RCW 4.08.110, either upon a contract made by such county, or other public corporation in its corporate character and within the scope of its authority, or for an injury to the rights of the plaintiff arising from some act or omission of such county or other public corporation.

[ 1953 c 118 s 2. Prior: Code 1881 s 662; 1869 p 154 s 602; RRS s 951.]